sk_SK/hyph_sk_SK.dic
.ne5a4
.ne5do3u2k
.ne5e4
.ne5i4
.ne5m4
.ne5na5h4
.ne5na5i4
.ne5na5k4
.ne5na5m4
.ne5na5p4
.ne5na5s4
.ne5na5t4
.ne5p4
.ne5s4
.ne6s5tor
.ne5№4
.ne5t4
.ne6t5t
.ne5u2
.ne5ъ2
.ne5v4
.ne5z4d4r
.ne5z4d4v
.ne5z4l
.ne5z4m
.ne5z4n
.ne5z4r
.ne5z4v
.nie5k4
.ni5k4
.ni6k5to№
.nнzko5k4
.novo5u2
.novo5z2
.obi5d4
.ob5k4
.obo5s4
.obo5z4
.ob5s4
.ob5t4
.ob5z4
.od5b4
.od5c4
.od5d4
.od5f4
.od5h4
.od5c4h4
.od5i4
.od6i5у
.od5н4
.od5k4
.odo5b4
.odo5h4
.odo5k4
.odo5m4k4
.odo5p4
.odo5s4
.od5p4
.od5s4
.od5№4
.od5t4
.od5v4
.od5z4
.t4v4r
.o5h4l
.o5h4µ
.o5h4na
.o5h4nъ
.o5h4r
.o5c4h4
.o5k4l
.o5k4µ
.okolo5i
.okolo5s4
.o5k4ra
.o5k4rб
.o5k4resa»
.o5k4resбva»
.o5k4ri
.o5k4rн
.o5k4ru
.o5k4rъ
.o5m4l
.o5m4n
.o5m4r
.o5p4
.o6p5lan
.o6p5rat
.o5s4lab
.o5s4lad
.o5s4lav
.o5s4lбv
.o5s4lep
.o5s4lo
.o5s4p4
.o5s4tar
.o5s4ta»
.o5s4tan
.o5s4taт
.o6s5tatn
.o5s4tatok
.o5s4tatk
.o5s4tбv
.o5s6to5
.o5s6t4rap
.ostro5u
.o5s4ved
.o5s4vetl
.o5s4viet
.o5s4vieѕ
.o5s4vit
.o5s4voj
.o5№4k4
.o5№4µ4
.o5№4m4
.o5№4p4
.o5№4v4
.o5t4ras
.o5t4rav
.o5t4rбv
.o5t4rep
.o5t4ria
.o5v4dov
.o5v4lбd
.o5v4laѕ
.o5v4p4
.o5v4r
.o5z4l4
.o5z4n
.o5z4re
.o5z4v4l
.pд»5izbo
.plno5a
.plno5p4
.plno5№4
.plno5kr4
.plocho5d4
.po5b4
.po5и4
.poda5k4
.pod5b4r
.pod5h4
.pod5c4h
.pod5k4
.pod5p4
.po5d4rбѕ
.po5d4rep
.pod5re
.po5d4rh
.po5d4rie
.po5d4rm
.po5d4rv
.po5d4r4ѕ
.pod5s4koи
.pod5v4
.pod3zem
.pod3zol
.pod3ѕa
.pod3ѕu
.po5h4
.po6h5reb
.po5c4h4
.po5i4
.po5k4
.pol5d4
.pol5i4z
.polo5a
.polo5b4
.pol5o4blъ
.polo5d4
.polo5h4l
.polo5i
.polo5k4
.polo5m4
.polo5o4
.polo5p4
.polo5s4
.polo5t4
.polo5u4
.polo5ъ4
.polo5v4
.polo5z4
.pol5s4t
.po5m4
.po6m5nнk
.po5o4
.po5ob4h
.po5ob4l
.po5s4
.po6s4t5s4k4rip
.po6s5tul
.po5№4
.po6№5ta
.po6№5tov
.po6№5v
.po5t4k4n
.po5t4µ
.po5t4r
.poroz5p4
.poroz5s4
.poroz5v4
.po6st5g4r
.po6s5ti
.po5t4
.po5u
.po5v4
.po4v5ra
.povy5h4
.povy5k4
.povy5p4
.povy5s4
.povy5v4
.povy5z4
.po5v4z4b
.po5z4
.pra5o4
.pra5p4
.pravicovo5o
.pra5v4l
.pra5v4nu
.pra5v4nъ
.prб5vo5p4
.pra5vo5s4
.pre5b4
.pre5c4
.pred5c4
.pred5h4
.pred5ch4
.pred5i
.pred5k4
.pred5m4
.predo5h4
.pred5op
.pred5ostatn
.pred5p4
.pre5d4rah
.pre5d4rap
.pre5d4ra»
.pre5d4raѕ
.pre5d4ri
.pre5d4rѕ
.pred5s4
.pred5v4
.pred5z4
.pre5и4
.pre5e2
.pre5f2
.pre5h4
.pre5c4h4
.pre5i4
.pre5k4
.pre6k5vap
.pre5m4
.pre5o4
.pre5p4
.pre5s4
.pre6s5n
.pre5№4
.pre5t4
.pre5v4
.pre5z4
.pre5ѕ4
.pri5b4
.pri5и4
.pri5d4
.pri5h4
.pri5c4h4
.pri5k4
.prн5k4
.pri5m4
.pri5p4
.pri5s4
.prн5s4
.prн6s5p
.pri6s5p
.pri5s4pф
.pri5№4
.pri6№5la.
.pri6№5li.
.pri6№5lo.
.pri5t4
.pri5v4
.pri5z4
.pri5ѕ4
.re5g4
.re5k4
.re6k5v
.re5p4
.re6p5n
.re5№4
.re5t4
.ro4z5i4
.ro6z5н4
.rozo5b4
.rozo5d4
.rozo5c4h4
.rozo5m4
.rozo5p4
.rozo5r4
.rozo5s4
.rozo5№4
.rozo5z4
.rozo5ѕ4
.ro6z5u4
.ro6z5v4
3s4polu5
3s4polu5h4
3s4polu5p4
3s4polu5v4
.№ikmo5o
.№iroko5
.№iroko5p4
.№tбto5
.№t4vor5
.su4b5s4
.sъ5h4
.sъ5k4r
.sъ5m4r
.sъ5s4
.sъ5v4
.sъ5z4
.troj5
.t4v4r4do5
.viac5k4
.viac5v4
.vide2o5
.vnъtro5s4
.vnъtro5№4
.vo5p4ch
.vo5p4r
.vo5s4p
.vo5t4
.vo5v4
.vy5
.vэ5
.vy5b4
.vy5c4
.vэ5c4
.vy5и4
.vэ5и4
.vy5d4
.vэ5d4
.vy5h4
.vy6h5т
.vy6h5ne
.vэ5h4
.vy5c4h4
.vy5k4
.vэ5k4
.vy5m4
.vy5p4
.vэ5p4
.vy5s4
.vэ5s4
.vy5№4
.vy6№5№
.vэ6№5k
.vy5t4
.vэ5t4
.vy5v4
.vy5z4
.vэ5z4
.za5b4
.zб5b4
.za5c4
.za5и4
.za5d4
.za5h4
.za5c4h4
.za5k4
.za5m4
.za5p4
.za5r4
.za5s4
.za5№4
.za5t4
.za5v4
.za5z4
.za5ѕ4
.zб5k4
.zб5z4
.zo5b4
.zo6d5p
.zo5d4r
.zo5d4v
.zo5h4
.zo5m4l
.zo5m4r
.zo5s4
.zo5№4
.zo5t4
.zo5v4
.zo5z4
.zo5ѕ4
5alkohol
auto4rk
auto4rs
5b4lah
5b4ledn
5b4lesk
5b4lok
5b4lъd
5b4lysk
5b4lysn
5boh3vi4e3a2k
5boh3vi4e3o2d3k
5boh3z4
5boles4t5n
5b4ra»
5b4rбzd
5b4rec2h
5b4ronz
5b4ruи
5b4rъs
5b4rэzg
5c4muk
5c4nie
5c4vak
5c4viи
5c4vik
ин6s5lov
5и4len
5и4lбnk
5и4lбnok
5и4lov
5d4тov
5d4ramat
5d4ra»
5d4vanбs4»5
5d4vih
5d4viѕ
5d4voj
5d4vor
5e2u2rуp
5f4µak
5f4lias
5f4rancъ
5f4rekven
5f4rбz
5g4raf
5g4ram
pro6g5ram
5g4rйи
5g4rob
5g4vardej
5h4lad
5h4las
5h4lav
5h4µad
5h4liad
5h4luch
5h4mat
5h4mot
5h4na»
5h4ned
5h4nev
5h4niezd
5h4noj
5h4nut
5h4nъ»
5h4nъt
5h4rab
5h4r3mot
5h4ran
5h4ra»
5h4rob
5h4rom
5h4roz
5h4rub
5h4ryz
5h4viezd
5c6h4lap
5c6h4leb
5c6hran
5c6h4rбn
5c6h4rбт
5c6h4vбl
5c6h4vбt
5c6h4vat
5c6h4vost
5jedenбs4t5k
5jedenбs4»5
5k4lad
5k4laп
5k4µak
5k4lam
5k4lбs»
5k4liat
5k4lia»
5k4lep
5k4les
5k4µъи
5k4resb
5k4res»
5k4ritic
5k4rнdl
5k4rфch
5k4ruh
5k4rъѕ
5k4ryt
5k4valif
5k4valit
5k4vet
5k4vadr
5m4ladis4t3v
5m4noѕ
5m4rav
5m4rбz
na5d4ѕ4ga
na5d4ѕ4gб
nav3№4tev
nбv3№4tev
nav3№4tнv
5p4lбn
5p4lastik
5p4lat
5p4lav
5p4leta
5p4letie
5p4letъ
5p4lies»
5p4ne2umat
5p4rбv
s6prбv
5p4riam
5p4rirod
5p2risбm
5p4roduk
5s4fйr
5s4c2hopn
5s4k4lad
5s4k4lon
5s4koи
5s4kok
5s4kop
5s4kor
5s4kфr
5s4k4romne
5s4k4rot
5s4k4rъc
5s4k4rutk
5s4k4rэv
5s4kъsen
5s4kutoи
5s4k4vъc
5s4ladk
5s4lav
5s4lбv
5s4led
5s4lep
5s4lovn
5s4love
5s4lova
5s4lovk
5s4luh
5s4lъѕ
5s4µub
5s4maѕ
5s4mel
5s4mer
5s4piev
5s4pev
5s4por
5s4potreb
5s4p4ravod
5s4p4raved
5s4p4rбvn
5s4p4ravo
5s4tarost
5s4tatic
5s4tav
5s4t4rach
5s4t4ran
5s4t4rбn
5s4t4rбda
5s4t4ra№
5s4t2rat
5s4t2red
5s4t2rek
5s4t4rel
5s4t4reµ
5s4t4riel
5s4t4rieµ
5s4t4rih
5s4t4riѕ
5s4t4rom
5s4t4rъh
5s4t4run
5s4t4ruѕ
5s4tati
5d2ve5s4to
5t2ri5s4to
5№4tyri5s4to
5pд»5s4to
5№es4»5s4to
5sedem5s4to
5osem5s4to
5devд»5s4to
5pд»5
5№es4»5
5s4t4la
5s4tup
5s4ved
5№4µah
5№4liap
5№4kola
5№4k4rab
5№4k4rie
5№4pin
5№4p4liech
5№4print
5№4tart
5№4tбt
5№4tep
5№4tнt
5№4t4ruktъr
5№4tude
5№4tudo
5№4t4vera
5№4t4vorec
5№4tyli
5№4»ast
5№tiep4
5№4t4v4r4»5k4
5№4t4v4r4»5l4
5№4t4v4r4»5r4
5№4t4v4r4»5s4
5t4laи
5t4lak
5t4ran4s5
5t4ras
5t4resk
5t4retin
5t4ried
5t4rub
5t4r4vaj
5t4r4val
5t4r4van
5uholnнk
5uhoµn
5viac5h4
5v4иera
5v4lбd
5v4las
5v4rбs
5v4rav
5v4rat
5v4rбt
5v4№imn
5v4tбk
5v4tip
5vy5s4t4rбja
5v4z4du
5v4z4»ah
5v4z4»aѕ
5z4lom
5z4luи
5z4mysel
5z4mysl
5z4nak
5z4nбm
5z4nб№a
5z4rak
5z4vдz
5z4vest
5zv4es»
5z4vod
5z4vuk
5z4vuи
5ѕ4rби
5ѕ4rane
5ѕ4reb
5ѕ4rъt
.cv6
.ch6
.sp6
.st6
.№k6
.№p6
.№t6
.tk6
.uh6
.uc6h6
.uk6
.um6
.up6
.us6
.ъs6
.usc6h6
.ъsc6h
.usk6
.ъsl6
.usm6
.ъsm6
.ъs7ta.
.ъs7tami.
.ъs7toи
.ъs7ti
.ust6l
.ъst7ny
.ust6r
.ъs7tret
.us7t4ric
.ъs6t6r
.ъ№6
.ut6
.uv6
.uz6
.vd6
.vh6
.vk6
.vp6
.vs6
.v№6
.vt6
.vz6
.vzh6
.vzk6
.vzl6
.vzp6
.vѕ6
.zb6
.zd6n
.zd6r
.zd6v
.zg6
.zh6
.zm6
.zr6
.zv6
4b4s4».
8c4h.
8d4z.
8d4ѕ.
4c4ht4.
4j4s4».
4lt.
4m4p4r.
4m4p4s.
4m4№4t.
4n4k4t.
4p4r4v.
4rd.
r4p4t.
r4№4и.
r4t4z.
4st.
4s».
5k4rбt.
5s4to5k4rбt.
5t4µ4c4».
akci3a2
akvбri3u2m
gymnбzi3um
le2u3kйmia
t2ri3u2mf
kli3e2nt
